North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 16. Occupational Safety and Health Act of North Carolina.
§ 95-144.
Statistics.

In order to further the purposes of this Article, the Commissioner shall develop and maintain an effective program of collection, compilation, and analysis of occupational safety and health statistics. The Commissioner shall compile accurate statistics on work injuries and illnesses which shall include all disabling, serious or significant injuries or illnesses, whether or not involving loss of time from work, other than minor injuries requiring only first-aid treatment and which do not involve medical treatment, loss of consciousness, restriction of work or motion, or transfer to another job. On the basis of records made and kept pursuant to the provisions of this Article, employers shall file such reports with the Commissioner as he shall prescribe by regulations and as may be necessary to carry out his functions.

A listing of employment by area and industry of employers who have an assigned account number by the Division of Employment Security (DES) of the Department of Commerce of this State shall be supplied annually to the Commissioner by the DES. The listing of employment by area and industry shall contain at least the following: employer name; DES account number; indication of whether multiple or a single report unit; number of reporting units; average employment; establishment size code; geographical area; any four-digit code; and any other information deemed necessary by the Commissioner to meet federal reporting requirements.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 19; 2011-401, s. 5.1.

§ 95-145.
Reports to the Secretary.

The Commissioner shall require employers in the State to make reports to the Secretary in the same manner and to the same extent as if the plan in force under this Article were not in effect, and

The Commissioner shall make such reports to the Secretary in such form and containing such information as the Secretary from time to time shall require.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 20.

§ 95-146.
Continuation and effectiveness of this Article.

The Commissioner shall from time to time furnish to the Secretary information and assurances that this Article is being administered by adequate methods and by standards and enforcement procedures which are and will continue to be as effective as federal standards.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 21.

§ 95-147.
Training and employee education.

The Commissioner, after consultation with appropriate departments and agencies of the State and subdivisions of government, shall conduct, directly or by grants or contracts, (i) education programs to provide an adequate supply of qualified personnel to carry out the purposes of this Article, and (ii) informational, educational and training programs on the importance of and proper use of adequate safety and health equipment to encourage voluntary compliance.

The Commissioner is also authorized to conduct, directly or by grants or contracts, short-term training of personnel engaged in work related to the Commissioner’s responsibilities under this Article.

The Commissioner shall provide employers and employees programs covering recognition, avoidance and prevention of unsafe and unhealthful working conditions in places of employment and shall advise employers and employees, or their representatives, [of] effective means to prevent occupational injuries and illnesses.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 22.

§ 95-148.
Safety and health programs of State agencies and local governments.

It shall be the responsibility of each administrative department, commission, board, division or other agency of the State and of counties, cities, towns and subdivisions of government to establish and maintain an effective and comprehensive occupational safety and health program which is consistent with the standards and regulations promulgated under this Article. The head of each agency shall:

Provide safe and healthful places and conditions of employment, consistent with the standards and regulations promulgated by this Article.

Acquire, maintain, and require the use of safety equipment, personal protective equipment, and devices reasonably necessary to protect employees.

Consult with and encourage employees to cooperate in achieving safe and healthful working conditions.

Keep adequate records of all occupational accidents and illnesses for proper evaluation and corrective action.

Consult with the Commissioner as to the adequacy as to form and content of records kept pursuant to this section.

Make an annual report to the Commissioner with respect to occupational accidents and injuries and the agency’s program under this section.

The Commissioner shall transmit annually to the Governor and the General Assembly a report of the activities of the State agency and instrumentalities under this section. If the Commissioner has reason to believe that any local government program or program of any agency of the State is ineffective, the Commissioner shall, after unsuccessfully seeking by negotiations to abate this failure, include this in the Commissioner’s annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly, together with the reasons therefor, and may recommend legislation intended to correct the condition.

The Commissioner shall have access to the records and reports kept and filed by State agencies and instrumentalities pursuant to this section unless such records and reports are required to be kept secret in the interest of national defense, in which case the Commissioner shall have access to such information as will not jeopardize national defense.

Employees of any agency or department covered under this section are afforded the same rights and protections as granted employees in the private sector.

This section shall not apply to volunteer fire departments not a part of any municipality.

Any municipality with a population of 10,000 or less may exclude its fire department from the operation of this section by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality, except that the resolution may not exclude those firefighters who are employees of the municipality.

The North Carolina Fire and Rescue Commission shall recommend regulations and standards for fire departments.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 23; 1983, c. 164; 1985, c. 544; 1989, c. 750, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1020, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 6, effective August 11, 2014, made stylistic, punctuation, and gender neutralization changes throughout the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “From Andrews to Woodson and Beyond: The Development of the Intentional Tort Exception to the Exclusive Remedy Provision—Rescuing North Carolina Workers from Treacherous Waters,” see 20 N.C. Cent. L.J. 164 (1992).

§ 95-149.
Authority to enter into contracts with other State agencies and subdivisions of government.

The Commissioner may enter into contracts with the Department of Health and Human Services or any other State officer or State agency or State instrumentality, or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the State, for the enforcement, administration, and any other application of the provisions of this Article.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 24; 1989, c. 727, s. 24; 1997-443, s. 11A.35.

§ 95-150.
Assurance of adequate funds to enforce Article.

The Commissioner shall submit to the General Assembly a budget and request for appropriations to adequately administer this Article which shall be sufficient to give satisfactory assurance that this State will devote adequate funds to the administration and enforcement of the standards herein provided and the proper administration of this Article as required by federal standards.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 25.

§ 95-151.
Discrimination.

No employer, employee, or any other person related to the administration of this Article shall be discriminated against in any work, procedure, or employment by reason of sex, race, ethnic origin, or by reason of religious affiliation.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 26.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “States of Confusion:
The Rise of State and Local Power Over Immigration,” see 86 N.C.L. Rev. 1557 2008.

For article, “The War Against Chinese Restaurants,” see 67 Duke L.J. 681 (2018).

For article, “’ Newtrality’: A Contemporary Alternative to Race-Neutral Pedagogy,” see
43 Campbell L. Rev. 171 (2021).

§ 95-152.
Confidentiality of trade secrets.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the Commissioner or his agents or representatives in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this Article which contains or which might reveal a trade secret shall be considered confidential, as provided by section 1905 of Title 18 of U.S.C., except as to carrying out this Article or when it is relevant in any proceeding under this Article. In any such proceeding the Commissioner, the Commission, or the court shall issue such orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 27; 2005-133, s. 9.

§ 95-153.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 95-154.
Authorization for similar safety and health federal-state programs.

Consistent with the requirements and conditions provided in this Article the State, upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Labor and approval of the Governor, may enter into agreements or arrangements with other federal agencies for the purpose of administering occupational safety and health measures for such employees and employers within the State of North Carolina as may be covered by such federal safety and health statutes.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 29.

§ 95-155.
Construction of Article and severability.

This Article shall receive a liberal construction to the end that the safety and health of the employees of the State may be effectuated and protected. If any provision of this Article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Article are severable.

History.

1973, c. 295, s. 30.

§ 95-156.
Handling of dangerous antineoplastic agents.

The Commissioner of Labor shall adopt rules to establish requirements for the handling of antineoplastic agents in facilities where there is occupational exposure to antineoplastic agents.

The rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with, but not exceed, the recommendations issued by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), as contained in the Alert: Preventing Occupational Exposure to Antineoplastic and Other Hazardous Drugs in Health Care Settings, as published in 2004 and including subsequent amendments and editions. The Department’s adoption of the rules may incorporate updates and changes to NIOSH’s guidelines as made by CDC.

Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall not apply to an entity that has obtained a permit pursuant to G.S. 90-85.21 or G.S. 90-85.21A.

The Commissioner shall enforce these rules and investigate complaints in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

History.

2014-76, s. 4.

§ 95-157.
Carolina Star Program.

The Commissioner may adopt rules for the operation of the Carolina Star Program in a manner that will promote safe and healthy workplaces throughout the State. The rules for the Carolina Star Program adopted by the Commissioner shall pertain to the following matters:

Upper management leadership and active and meaningful employee involvement.

Systematic assessment of occupational hazards.

Comprehensive hazard prevention, control, and mitigation programs.

Employee safety and health training.

Annual safety and health program evaluation.

Star Annual Report.

Attendance and active participation on Carolina Star Safety Conference Regional Teams and conference related activities.

Applications for participation in the Carolina Star Program shall be submitted by the workplace’s management. Applications shall include documentation establishing to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that the employer meets all standards for Carolina Star Program participation.

The Department shall provide for on-site evaluations, as resources allow, by Carolina Star Program evaluation teams of each workplace that has applied to participate in the Carolina Star Program to determine if the applicant’s workplace complies with the standards for Carolina Star Program participation.

A workplace’s continued participation in the Carolina Star Program shall be conditioned on meeting the requirements and expectations established by the Carolina Star Program Policies and Procedures Manual, Star Annual Report, and successful completion of periodic on-site evaluations conducted by the Carolina Star Program evaluation team.

During periods in which a workplace is a participant in the Carolina Star Program, the workplace shall be exempt from inspections under

G.S. 95-136

; however, this exception shall not apply to inspections or investigations of the workplace arising from complaints, referrals, fatalities, catastrophes, nonfatal accidents, or significant toxic chemical releases.

History.

2017-211, s. 15(b).

§§ 95-158 through 95-160.

Reserved for future codification purposes.